Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-20,101
Rules and regulations.

The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out sections 71-2097 to 71-20,101, including rules and regulations for notice and appeal procedures.

Laws 1996, LB 1155, § 76;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 184;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 527.